Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 12 Rhode Island Turnpike and Bridge Authority
24-12-18.
Bonds.

Issuance and sale of revenue bonds. The authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance, at one time or in series from time to time, of revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of paying all or a part of the cost of any one or more projects, the construction, reconstruction, renovation, acquisition, maintenance, repair, operation or management of which is authorized by this chapter, and making provision for working capital and a debt service reserve. The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for the payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates per annum, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding fifty (50) years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The authority may sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine to be for the best interests of the authority.

Form and execution of all bonds. The authority shall determine the form and the manner of execution of all bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of the principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds, the signature or the facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until the delivery, and any bond may bear the facsimile signature of, or may be signed by, the persons as at the actual time of the execution of the bond shall be the proper officers to sign the bond although at the date of the bond the persons may not have been the officers. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, and in certificated or book entry only form as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-18

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 11; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 11; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3.

24-12-19.
Use of bond proceeds — Supplementary issues — Surplus proceeds.

The proceeds of the bonds of each issue shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or projects for which the bonds shall have been issued, and shall be disbursed in the manner and under the restrictions, if any, as the authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement hereinafter mentioned securing the bonds; provided, however, that the amount of the proceeds of the revenue bonds of the first series as may be determined by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds may be applied to the payment of engineering, financing, and legal services in connection with the financing and the construction of the Newport Bridge or the turnpike or both. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue, by error of estimates or otherwise, shall be less than the cost, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of the deficit, and, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference of priority of the bonds first issued. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the cost, the surplus shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund for the bonds or, if so authorized by the authority, may be applied to the payment of the cost of any project thereafter financed under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 7; G.L. 1956; §

24-12-19

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 12.

24-12-20.
Interim receipts or temporary bonds — Replacement of lost or mutilated bonds — Proceedings required by chapter exclusive.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when the bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-20

.

24-12-21.
Retirement of outstanding bridge revenue refunding bonds of Jamestown Bridge commission.

Within three (3) months prior to the estimated date of opening for traffic of the Newport Bridge, but not earlier than December 31, 1965, and in case provision shall not theretofore have been made for the redemption of the outstanding bridge revenue refunding bonds of the Jamestown Bridge commission through the operation of the sinking fund for the bonds, the authority may issue its revenue bonds in an amount sufficient, with other funds available for such purposes, to provide for the redemption of all of the outstanding bonds on their earliest redemption date, including the principal amount of the bonds, the premium required to be paid upon the principal amount on the redemption date and the interest to accrue on the principal amount to the redemption date, and upon there being deposited with the trustee under the trust indenture securing the outstanding bridge revenue refunding bonds an amount sufficient, with other funds available for the purpose, to provide for the redemption, all other money then held by the trustee under the trust indenture shall be transferred to the appropriate funds created under the provisions of the resolution of trust agreement securing the revenue bonds of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-21

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 13; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 12; P.L. 1965, ch. 43, § 5.

24-12-22.
Purchase of Jamestown-Newport ferry franchise.

In the event revenue bonds shall be issued in an amount estimated to be sufficient with any other available funds to pay the cost of constructing the Newport Bridge and opening the bridge for traffic, there shall be deposited with a bank or banks in the city of Newport or in the city of Providence for the credit of a special account in the name of the town of Jamestown, the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) as the cost of the ferry franchise, and the money so deposited shall be held by the bank or banks in the name of the town of Jamestown for the benefit of the town until such time as the Newport Bridge shall be open for traffic. Upon the opening, the ferry franchise shall be transferred to the authority, and thereafter in consideration of the transfer of the ferry franchise, the money so deposited shall be applied, to the extent necessary, to the retirement of the outstanding bonded indebtedness of the town of Jamestown incurred on account of ferry operations conducted by the Jamestown and Newport ferry company and any balance of the amount so deposited shall be paid to the treasurer of the town of Jamestown.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-22

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 14; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 13.

24-12-23.
Maintenance of Jamestown-Newport ferry service.

Until the Newport Bridge shall be opened for traffic, ferry service between the town of Jamestown and the city of Newport shall be maintained by the director of transportation and upon the opening of the Newport Bridge for traffic the ferry service shall be discontinued except that the director of transportation may provide ferry service for pedestrians only. The director of transportation is hereby authorized and empowered, after the transfer of the franchise to the authority, to provide ferry service for pedestrians only as provided in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-23

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 15; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 71.

24-12-24.
Pension fund for ferry company employees.

The town of Jamestown, by vote of the qualified electors of the town at any special or annual financial town meeting, is hereby authorized and empowered to use all or any part of any balance of the two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) paid to the town together with the proceeds realized from the sale or lease of any of the other assets of the Jamestown and Newport ferry company for the establishment of a pension fund for the care of retired employees of the Jamestown and Newport ferry company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-24

.

24-12-25.
Trust agreement.

In the discretion of the authority any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may pledge or assign the tolls and other revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage any project or any part thereof. The trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of the project or projects in connection with which the bonds shall have been authorized, the rates of toll to be charged, the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys, and conditions or limitations with respect to the issuance of additional bonds. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish the indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Any trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the authority’s cost of operation and maintenance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-25

.

24-12-26.
Power to collect tolls and charges — Gasoline and service concessions.

The authority is hereby authorized, subject to the provisions of this chapter, to fix, revise, charge and collect tolls for the use of the Newport Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the turnpike and the different parts or sections thereof, and for the use of any additional facility and the different parts or sections thereof, and to contract with any person, partnership, association or corporation for placing on any project telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, gas stations, garages, and restaurants if deemed necessary by the authority in connection with the project, or for the use of any project or part thereof, including the right-of-way adjoining the paved portion of the turnpike or of any additional facility or for any other purposes and to fix the terms, conditions, rents and rates of charges for such use; provided, that the authority shall construct any gasoline service facilities which it may determine are needed on the project, and provided, further, that, to afford users of the project a reasonable choice of motor fuels of different brands, each gasoline service station shall be separately offered for lease upon sealed bids and, after notice of the offer has been published once a week in three (3) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the state, and, in the event an acceptable bid shall be received in the judgment of the authority, each lease shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder therefor, but no person shall be awarded or have the use of, nor shall motor fuel identified by the trade-marks, trade names, or brands of any one supplier, distributor, or retailer of such fuel be sold at more than one service station if they would constitute more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the service stations on the project. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, members of the town of Jamestown police and fire department and ambulance service personnel of the town of Jamestown and Jamestown school department who, in the course of their duty, are required to pay a toll for use of the Newport Bridge, shall, upon the presentment of receipts for the payment of the toll to the town of Jamestown, be reimbursed for all charges on an annual basis by the town of Jamestown who in turn shall be reimbursed for all payments made by the state. The town of Jamestown shall submit a request for reimbursement to the division of municipal finance for the previous fiscal year (ending June 30th) no later than September 30th of the fiscal year following the fiscal year for which reimbursement is being requested. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, members of the city of Newport police and fire department and rescue personnel who, in the course of their duty, are required to pay a toll for use of the Newport Bridge, shall, upon the presentment of receipts for the payment of the toll to the city of Newport, be reimbursed for all charges on an annual basis by the city of Newport who in turn shall be reimbursed for all payments made by the state. The city of Newport shall submit a request for reimbursement to the division of municipal finance for the previous fiscal year (ending June 30th) no later than September 30th of the fiscal year following the fiscal year for which reimbursement is being requested.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, members of the police and fire department and rescue personnel of any city or town in this state who, in the course of their duty, are required to pay a toll for use of the Mount Hope Bridge or the Sakonnet River Bridge, if any, shall, upon the presentment of receipts for the payment of the toll to their town or city, be reimbursed for all such charges on an annual basis by the town or city, who in turn shall be reimbursed for all payments made by the state. Any city or town shall submit a request for reimbursement to the division of municipal finance for the previous fiscal year (ending June 30th) no later than September 30th of the fiscal year following the fiscal year for which reimbursement is being requested.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-26

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 16; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 14; P.L. 1985, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 312, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 500, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 8, § 1.

24-12-27.
Amount of tolls.

Tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of tolls from the project or projects or the portion or portions thereof in connection with which bonds shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues, if any, to pay (1) the cost of maintaining, repairing, and operating the project or projects or portion or portions thereof and (2) the principal of and the interest on the bonds as the principal and interest shall become due and payable, and to create reserves for such purposes; provided, however, that the authority shall establish commutation rates for traffic over the Mount Hope Bridge by all vehicles, which rates shall not be in excess of the commutation rates in effect for vehicles on January 1, 1960. Tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board, bureau or agency of the state or of any municipality or other political subdivision of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-27

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 17; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 15.

24-12-28.
Revenues pledged to sinking fund.

To the extent provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or finance lease or in the trust agreement securing the same, the tolls and all other revenues received by the authority, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or the trust agreement in a sinking fund or funds which shall be pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the lease payments and/or of the principal of and the interest on the bonds as the bonds shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds or other obligations retired by call or purchase as provided in the resolution or trust agreement. The pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; the tolls and other revenues or other money so pledged and thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the authority, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the authority. The use and disposition of money to the credit of each sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the lease, the bonds or of the trust agreement. Notwithstanding any provision(s) of Section 3 of Article 6 of Chapter 23 of the Public Laws of 2010, the provisions of this section shall apply to all bonds issued or to be issued by the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-28

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 18; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 36, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3.

24-12-29.
Trust funds — Trustee.

All money received pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. The authority shall, in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues to be received to a trustee, which shall be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state, who shall act as trustee of the funds, and hold and apply the bonds to the purposes of this chapter, subject to the regulations as this chapter and the resolution or trust agreement may provide.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-29

.

24-12-30.
Remedies of bondholders.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under the trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the trust agreement, may, either at law or in equity, by civil action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted under this chapter or under the trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the authority or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of tolls.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-30

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154.

24-12-31.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and as the acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance by the authority of the projects as defined in this chapter as will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon the projects or upon any property acquired or used by the authority under the provisions of this chapter or upon the income from the projects, and the bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, their transfer and the income therefrom (including any profit made on the sale thereof) shall at all times be free from taxation within the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-31

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154.

24-12-32.
Eligibility of bonds for investment.

Bonds issued by the authority under the provisions of this chapter are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the state and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-32

.

24-12-33.
Negotiability of bonds.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this chapter or any recitals in any bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter, all bonds shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-33

.

24-12-34.
Refunding bonds.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon or any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds, the cost of issuing the refunding bonds and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for the additional purpose of constructing improvements, extensions or enlargements of the project in connection with which the bonds to be refunded shall have been issued. The authority is further authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of its revenue bonds for the combined purpose of (1) refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this chapter, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued on or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds, and (2) paying all or any part of the cost of any additional project, and, if deemed advisable by the authority, the cost of any improvements, extensions, or enlargements. Pending the application of the proceeds of the revenue refunding bonds, with any other available funds, to the payment of the principal, accrued interest and premium of the bonds being refunded and, if so provided or permitted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue refunding bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds, to the payment of any interest on the refunding bonds, the authority may invest the proceeds in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and the interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America which shall mature, or which shall be subject to redemption by the holder thereof at the option of the holder, not later than the respective dates when the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be required for the purposes intended or, in lieu of the investments, the authority may place all or part of the proceeds in interest bearing time deposits or make other similar arrangements with regard thereto which will assure that the proceeds, together with the interest accruing thereon, will be available when required for the purposes intended. The issuance of the bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the authority in respect of the bonds shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter insofar as this chapter may be applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 15; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-34

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 19; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 16; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 36, § 1.

24-12-35.
Resolutions of authority.

Any action taken by the authority under the provisions of this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and each resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-35

.

24-12-36.
Annual report and audit.

Within the first ninety (90) days of each fiscal year of the authority, the authority shall make an annual report to the governor of its activities for the preceding fiscal year. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The state director of administration shall cause an annual audit of the books, records, and accounts of the authority to be made and the costs thereof shall be treated as a part of the cost of operation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-36

.

24-12-37.
Penalty for nonpayment of toll — Toll violators and toll evaders.

Legislative findings. The general assembly finds as follows:

That all users of any tolled projects should be required to timely pay for the use of such projects;

That toll violators and toll evaders unfairly shift the financial burden of maintaining the tolled projects to other project users; and

Rhode Island has a strong interest in ensuring that its transportation infrastructure is adequately funded in a fair and equitable manner.

In each instance when a person fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll on a tolled project, and is issued a violation for the same, the toll violator shall pay the toll amount within fourteen (14) days of issuance of the violation.

Any toll violator who fails to pay the toll amount due within the fourteen-day (14) period in subsection (b) shall immediately incur a forty-dollar ($40.00) administrative fee in addition to the unpaid toll amount.

Any toll violator who fails to pay the administrative fee and unpaid toll as required by subsection (c) within forty-five (45) days of the issuance of the original violation, shall incur a thirty five-dollar ($35.00) administrative fee in addition to the forty dollar ($40.00) administrative fee and the unpaid toll amount. The toll amount and administrative fees shall be paid to the authority.

Toll evaders shall be responsible for any tolls and administrative fees applicable to toll violators. Further, at the request of the authority, any toll evader shall also promptly receive a traffic violation summons that shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Rhode Island traffic tribunal, which may suspend the toll evader’s driver’s license for up to six (6) months for the violations and assess a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500), or both. All tolls, administrative fees, and fines shall be payable to the authority.

If any unpaid toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines are not paid within ninety (90) days of the issuance of the original violation, and the toll violator has incurred at least ten (10) instances in which such toll violator has failed to pay any required toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines, then the authority may report the person as a toll violator, or, if appropriate, as a toll evader, to the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles, who then shall not permit that person to renew his or her driver’s license and vehicle registration until any unpaid toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines are paid to the authority. Upon the authority’s receipt of such payment or a written repayment agreement between the person and the authority, the authority shall promptly issue a verbal, written, or electric confirmation showing the amounts paid and a certification that the person does not owe any amounts to the authority or has otherwise made satisfactory repayment arrangements with the authority. In any such case, the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles shall forthwith release any hold placed for this purpose on the person’s license renewal and vehicle registration renewal. If a person who made satisfactory repayment arrangements with the authority subsequently fails to honor and comply with such arrangements with the authority according to their terms, the authority may re-report the person to the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles which shall then prohibit that person from renewing their driver’s license and vehicle registration until the originally unpaid toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines are paid to the authority.

“Toll violator” means, for the purposes of this section, any person who uses any project and fails to pay or prepay the required toll.

“Toll evader” means, for the purposes of this section, any person who uses a project, fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll, and deliberately circumvents or proceeds around or through a gate or other barrier on a project; and/or any toll violator who fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll on a tolled project at least twenty (20) or more times, received at least three (3) written notices from the authority (or its agent) regarding the non-payment of tolls, and is not a party to, or in current compliance with, a written repayment plan with the authority.

The authority may promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to ensure the proper administration of the provisions of this section. Any person aggrieved by the authority’s assessment of any administrative fees may request review of such assessment through the process established by the authority, which shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

For the purposes of this section only, “person” means the registered owner, EZPass account holder, driver, rentee, or lessee of a motor vehicle.

This section shall apply retroactively to all persons who are toll evaders as of the effective date of this act [October 1, 2016].

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to reduce or otherwise eliminate any tolls, fines, or penalties a person owes to the authority based upon violations occurring prior to the effective date of this act [October 1, 2016].

It is unlawful for any person or business, other than an authorized representative of the authority, or any other duly authorized and existing toll or transportation agency, to sell, lease, rent, or offer for sale, lease or rent, any tokens, tickets, passes, transponders, or other evidences of payment issued for passage on any project. Any person or business who or that is found in violation of this subsection shall be punished, for each offense, by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

If any provision of this section or its application to any person is deemed invalid, any such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions of this section that may lawfully be given effect without the invalid provision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-37

; P.L. 1999, ch. 371, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 414, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 405, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 33; P.L. 2016, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 398, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 148, § 1.

24-12-37.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 383, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 405, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 382, § 1, effective July 9, 2016; P.L. 2016, ch. 396, § 1, effective July 9, 2016.

24-12-37.2.
Driver/registered owner liability.

The registered owner of the motor vehicle shall be primarily responsible in all prosecutions brought pursuant to the provisions of §§

24-12-37

and

24-12-37.1

.

In all prosecutions of nonpayment of toll violations, there is a rebuttable presumption that the registered owner of the vehicle was the operator of the vehicle and may be liable for the violation. The registered owner of the vehicle may assume liability for the violation by paying the fine; or by defending the violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 383, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 405, § 2.

24-12-38.
Covenant against competition.

The state covenants and agrees with the holders of any bonds or obligations of the authority that the state will not authorize or permit the construction, operation, and maintenance of any additional facility for the transportation of passenger vehicles by any person or body other than the authority within a distance of ten (10) miles in either direction from any project financed by the authority under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 20.

24-12-39.
Transfer of projects to state — Dissolution of authority.

When all bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter and the interest thereon shall have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of all the bonds and the interest thereon to the maturity thereof shall have been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders, all projects financed under the provisions of this chapter may be transferred to the state in good condition and repair, and thereupon the authority shall be dissolved and all funds of the authority not required for the payment of bonds shall be paid to the general treasurer for the use of the state and all machinery, equipment and other property belonging to the authority shall be vested in the state and delivered to the department of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-39

; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 21; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3.

24-12-40.
Dissolution of Jamestown Bridge commission — Bridge to become toll free portion of state highway system — Covenants with bondholders.

In case provision shall be made for the redemption of the outstanding bridge revenue refunding bonds of the Jamestown Bridge commission through the operation of the sinking fund for the bonds before the issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of §

24-12-21

, or in case the outstanding bridge revenue refunding bonds are retired from the proceeds of revenue bonds issued under the provisions of §

24-12-21

, and in either event, the Jamestown Bridge commission shall thereupon be dissolved and all powers, control, and jurisdiction over and title to the Jamestown Bridge shall vest immediately in the state, which shall thereafter maintain, repair, and operate the bridge and the bridge shall thereafter constitute a toll free portion of the state highway system.

In recognition of engineering studies which show that the charging and collecting of tolls for the use of the Jamestown Bridge or a failure of the state to maintain, repair, and operate the bridge would decrease traffic over the Newport Bridge and diminish the toll revenues to be received on account of the operation of the Newport Bridge, the state covenants and agrees with the holders of any bonds or obligations of the authority issued to pay the cost of the Newport Bridge, that during any period when the bonds or obligations shall be outstanding and unpaid, the laws of Rhode Island shall not be amended to authorize or permit the charging and collecting of tolls on the Jamestown Bridge and the state shall maintain, repair, and operate the Jamestown Bridge as a portion of the state highway system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-40

; P.L. 1959, ch. 176, § 2; P.L. 1960, ch. 219, §§ 1, 22; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 17.

24-12-40A.
Title to Mount Hope Bridge vested in Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority — Continuation of tolls.

All powers, control, and jurisdiction of and title to the Mount Hope Bridge is hereby affirmed as having vested in the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority as of June 1, 1964, and the transfer of funds to the authority by the trustee under the trust indenture securing the Mount Hope Bridge revenue bonds is hereby ratified and affirmed. The authority shall continue to charge and collect tolls for the use of the Mount Hope Bridge to provide funds sufficient with any other monies available therefor for paying the costs of maintaining, repairing, and operating the bridge, and in any event tolls for the use of the Mount Hope Bridge shall continue until a fund shall be provided for the payment of engineering, financing, and legal services in connection with the financing and construction of the Newport Bridge. The power and right of the authority to collect and to use tolls collected for the use of the Mount Hope Bridge subsequent to June 1, 1964 for the purpose of payment of engineering, financial, and legal services in connection with the financing and construction of the Newport Bridge in an amount heretofore expended not in excess of six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) is hereby ratified and affirmed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 19; P.L. 1965, § 19; P.L. 1965, ch. 43, § 1.